North Carolina statutes. Chapter 66. Commerce and Business.
Article 18. Labeling of Household Cleaners.

§ 66-85.
Labeling cleaners containing volatile substances capable of producing toxic effects; definition.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation manufacturing household cleaners which contain volatile substances capable of producing toxic effects in or on their users when used for their intended domestic purposes to sell or offer for sale any such cleaner unless such cleaner shall be labeled with the word “caution” or other word of similar import and unless directions shall plainly appear thereon as to the safe and proper use of the contents. Such label shall identify the particular substance contained therein. The phrase “volatile substances capable of producing toxic effect” as used herein shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: benzene (benzol), toluene (toluol), coal tar naphtha, carbon tetrachloride, trichlorethylene, tetrachlorethylene (perchlorethylene), tetrachlorethane, methyl alcohol, and aromatic and chlorinated hydrocarbons of comparable volatility and toxicity.

History.

1957, c. 1241, s. 1.

§ 66-86.
Penalty for selling product in violation of Article.

Any person, firm or corporation selling or offering to sell any product in violation of the terms of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1957, c. 1241, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 520; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 66-87.
Injunctions.

Upon complaint by the Department of Health and Human Services, the superior court shall have jurisdiction to enjoin any sale or offer of sale which is in violation of the provisions of this Article.

History.

1957, c. 1241, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 66-88.
Application of Article after enactment of federal legislation.

If the Congress of the United States shall, at any time hereafter, enact in any form legislation designed to regulate the interstate distribution, labeling and sale of hazardous articles in packages suitable for or intended for household use, the Department of Health and Human Services shall, upon so determining, issue a proclamation to such effect and, from and after the date of such proclamation, this Article shall be applicable only with respect to intrastate manufacture, distribution, sale and labeling by persons, firms or corporations who do not comply with the federal legislation as to interstate distribution, labeling and sale of the materials or articles described in

G.S. 66-85

.

History.

1957, c. 1241, s. 31/2; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§§ 66-89 through 66-93.

Reserved for future codification purposes.